North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-10 Aid to Crippled Children [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, chapter 39, § 23]

50-10-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 39 § 23.

50-10-02.
Crippled children’s commission — Members — Appointment — Term of office — Removal. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 468, § 5.

50-10-03.
Commission — Compensation — Chairman. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 468, § 5.

50-10-04.
Commission — Powers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 468, § 5.

50-10-05.
Administration of services for crippled children by state agency. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 39, § 23.

50-10-06.
Duties of the state agency. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 39, § 23.

50-10-07.
Birth report of crippled child made to state agency. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 39, § 23.

50-10-08.
Birth report of crippled child — Use — Confidential. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 39, § 23.

50-10-09.
Duties of the county agencies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 39, § 23.

50-10-10.
Russell-Silver syndrome — Services — Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 39, § 23.